Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1412.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 6-190, as
last amended by Section 1, Chapter 122, O.S.L. 2024 (70 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 6-190), is amended to read as follows:
Section 6-190. A. The board of education of each school
district shall employ and contract in writing, as required in
Section 6-101 of this title, only with persons certified to teach by
the State Board of Education in accordance with the Oklahoma Teacher
Preparation Act, except as otherwise provided for by Section 6-101
of this title and by other law.

B. The Board shall issue a certificate to teach to any person
who:
1. Has successfully completed the teacher education program
required by the Commission for Educational Quality and
Accountability;
2. Has graduated from an accredited institution of higher
education that has approval or accreditation for teacher education;
3. Has met all other requirements as may be established by the
Board;
4. Has made the necessary application and paid the competency
examination fee in an amount and as prescribed by the Commission;
5. Has successfully completed the competency examination
required in Section 6-187 of this title; and
6. Beginning November 1, 2001, has on file with the Board a
current Oklahoma criminal history record from the Oklahoma State
Bureau of Investigation as well as a national criminal history
record check as defined in Section 150.9 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma
Statutes. Upon receipt of the Oklahoma criminal history record, the
Board may issue a temporary certificate which shall be effective
until receipt of the national fingerprint-based criminal history
record. The person applying for a certificate shall be responsible
for the cost of the criminal history records.
C. The Board shall issue a certificate to teach to any person
who:
1. Holds an out-of-state certificate and meets the requirements
set forth in subsection G of this section;
2. Holds certification from the National Board for Professional
Teaching Standards;
3. Holds an out-of-country certificate and meets the
requirements set forth in subsection F of this section; or
4. Has successfully completed a competency examination used in
the majority of other states or comparable customized exam and meets
the requirements set forth in subsection H of this section.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1412 Page 2

D. Beginning July 1, 2004, any person applying for initial
Oklahoma certification shall have on file with the Board a current
Oklahoma criminal history record from the Oklahoma State Bureau of
Investigation as well as a national criminal history record check as
defined in Section 150.9 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes. Upon
receipt of the Oklahoma criminal history record, the Board may issue
a temporary certificate which shall be effective until receipt of
the national fingerprint-based criminal history record. The person
applying for a certificate shall be responsible for the cost of the
criminal history records.
E. Any person holding a valid certificate, issued prior to
January 1, 1997, shall be a certified teacher for purposes of the
Oklahoma Teacher Preparation Act, subject to any professional
development requirements prescribed by the Oklahoma Teacher
Preparation Act or by the State Board of Education.
F. 1. The Board shall issue a certificate to teach to a person
who holds a valid out-of-country certificate and meets any
requirements established by the Board. The certificate to teach
shall only be for those subject areas and grade levels most closely
aligned to the subject areas and grade levels recognized on the out-
of-country certificate.
2. A person who meets the requirements of paragraph 1 of this
subsection shall not be required to take any competency examinations
in those subject areas and grade levels most closely aligned to the
subject areas and grade levels recognized on the out-of-country
certificate.
3. A person who meets the requirements of paragraph 1 of this
subsection shall have on file with the Board a current Oklahoma
criminal history record check from the Oklahoma State Bureau of
Investigation as well as a national criminal history record check as
defined in Section 150.9 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes. Upon
receipt of the Oklahoma criminal history record check, the Board may
issue a temporary certificate which shall be effective until receipt
of the national fingerprint-based criminal history record check.
The person applying for a certificate shall be responsible for the
cost of the criminal history record checks.
4. The Board shall promulgate rules establishing a process by
which out-of-country certificates will be reviewed and evaluated for
purposes of awarding a certificate to teach pursuant to this
subsection.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1412 Page 3

G. 1. The Board shall issue a certificate to teach to a person
who holds a valid out-of-state certificate. The certificate to
teach shall only be for those subject areas and grade levels most
closely aligned to the subject areas and grade levels recognized on
the out-of-state certificate.
2. A person who meets the requirements of paragraph 1 of this
subsection shall not be required to take any competency examinations
in those subject areas and grade levels most closely aligned to the
subject areas and grade levels recognized on the out-of-state
certificate.
3. A person who meets the requirements of this subsection shall
have on file with the Board a current Oklahoma criminal history
record check from the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation as well
as a national criminal history record check as defined in Section
150.9 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes. Upon receipt of the
Oklahoma criminal history record check, the Board may issue a
temporary certificate which shall be effective until receipt of the
national fingerprint-based criminal history record check. The
person applying for a certificate shall be responsible for the cost
of the criminal history record checks.
H. 1. The Board shall issue a certificate to teach to a person
who has successfully completed a competency exam used in a majority
of the other states. The certificate to teach shall only be for
those subject areas and grade levels that correspond with a
certification area used in Oklahoma.
2. A person who meets the requirements of paragraph 1 of this
subsection shall have on file with the Board a current Oklahoma
criminal history record check from the Oklahoma State Bureau of
Investigation as well as a national criminal history record check as
defined in Section 150.9 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes. Upon
receipt of the Oklahoma criminal history record check, the Board may
issue a temporary certificate which shall be effective until receipt
of the national fingerprint-based criminal history record check.
The person applying for a certificate shall be responsible for the
cost of the criminal history record checks.
I. 1. The Board may establish new levels of teacher
certificates: advanced, lead, and master. Each level shall have a
salary increase requirement stipend paid with state dollars from the
lottery funds as provided in Section 713 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma
ENR. H. B. NO. 1412 Page 4

Statutes. The advanced certificate shall include a salary increase
stipend of Three Thousand Dollars ($3,000.00), the lead certificate
shall include a salary increase stipend of Five Thousand Dollars
($5,000.00), and the master certificate shall include a salary
increase stipend of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00).
2. A teacher who works in a school with an enrollment of forty
percent (40%) or more of students who are economically disadvantaged
as defined in Section 18-109.5 of this title or a school district
with an enrollment of fewer than one thousand students shall be paid
a one-time award in addition to the salary increases stipends
provided in paragraph 1 of this subsection:
a. One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00) for an
advanced certificate,
b. Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) for a
lead certificate, and
c. Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) for a master
certificate.
3. School districts may identify and designate the highest
quality teachers for advanced, lead, and master certificates.
Participating districts shall submit designation plans to the State
Department of Education for evaluation and approval. Districts
shall have local control and flexibility in determining how to
evaluate teachers and assign designations, but, at a minimum, the
designation system shall include a teacher observation, out-of-
classroom time, and a student performance component.
a. Teacher observation shall be based on the district’s
selected Oklahoma Teacher and Leader Effectiveness
Evaluation System (TLE) evaluation tool or an
alternate method of evaluation; provided, the method
is evidenced-based. Alternate methods of evaluation
shall not replace the requirements of Section 6-101.16
of this title.
b. Each school district that elects to participate in
assigning advanced, lead, and master teacher
certificates shall include an out-of-classroom
component for its assigned teachers to allow for
professional growth opportunities while staying in the
classroom. How out-of-classroom time is allotted and
ENR. H. B. NO. 1412 Page 5

managed shall be determined by the school district and
submitted as part of its designation plan to the State
Department of Education for review and approval.
c. Student performance measures may be determined by the
district and may include, but shall not be limited to,
pre- and post-tests, summative or formative, and
portfolios. The school district application shall
show evidence of validity and reliability of the
measures.
d. No more than ten percent (10%) of each school
district’s teachers may be designated as advanced,
lead, or master teachers in any given school year.
Districts which receive Title I funds within the top
quartile of individual student allotment amounts may
designate an additional ten percent (10%) of teachers
who are employed at school sites which receive the
Title I funds as advanced, lead, or master teachers.
Districts may use additional factors in determining which
teachers are eligible to receive a designation, such as student
surveys, teacher leadership responsibilities, teacher mentorship
responsibilities, family surveys, demonstration of district core
values, teacher peer surveys, and contributions to the broader
school community. No more than ten percent (10%) of each school
district’s teachers may be designated as an advanced, lead, or
master teacher in any given school year.
4. If a school district chooses to participate in this program,
the state shall provide the increased salary stipend amounts
indicated for advanced, lead, and master certificates in paragraph 1
of this subsection above the base pay.
5. School districts that designate teachers for advanced, lead,
and master certificates do not have to participate in annual TLE
evaluations for the designated teachers.
6. School districts may designate teachers for advanced, lead,
or master certificates two times per year, once prior to the
beginning of the school year, and once prior to the beginning of the
second semester. Teachers statewide who receive these designations
shall be placed in professional development cohorts and provided
additional training opportunities from the State Department of
Education.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1412 Page 6

7. After initial approval by the State Department of Education,
the Department shall review and validate each participating school
district’s teacher evaluation system biennially.
8. The State Department of Education shall annually report the
school districts participating in the program, the number of
advanced, lead, and master certificates awarded, and the total
amount in state funding that was distributed to teachers from the
Teacher Empowerment Revolving Fund created in Section 6-190.2 of
this title.
9. The selection criteria; designation of advanced, lead, or
master teachers; and any associated salary increases stipend amounts
shall not be subject to collective bargaining.
10. Stipends provided pursuant to this subsection shall not be
included in the calculation of the teacher’s salary for purposes of
meeting the district or statutory minimum salary schedule or for
purposes of calculating Teachers’ Retirement System of Oklahoma
contributions or benefits.
J. The State Board of Education shall adopt rules to implement
a renewal schedule and associated fees for advanced, lead, and
master teaching certificates. The rules shall allow a teacher that
no longer meets the requirements of an advanced, lead, or master
teaching certificate to make application for the standard teaching
certificate.
K. The terms of the contracts issued to those holding advanced,
lead, and master teaching certificates shall include the following:
1. Advanced: an additional five (5) days to be used to
strengthen instructional leadership. A person with an advanced
teaching certificate shall receive an annual salary increase stipend
of Three Thousand Dollars ($3,000.00) or the district’s daily rate
of pay, whichever is higher, in addition to the salary for which the
teacher qualifies pursuant to Section 18-114.15 of this title. This
increase stipend shall be funded by state dollars from the lottery
funds as provided in Section 713 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma
Statutes and shall be paid as regular annual compensation directly
to teachers through school districts;
2. Lead: an additional ten (10) days to be used to strengthen
instructional leadership. A person with a lead teaching certificate
ENR. H. B. NO. 1412 Page 7

shall receive an annual salary increase stipend of Five Thousand
Dollars ($5,000.00) or the district’s daily rate of pay, whichever
is higher, in addition to the salary for which the teacher qualifies
pursuant to Section 18-114.15 of this title. This increase stipend
shall be funded by state dollars from the lottery funds as provided
in Section 713 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes and shall be
paid as regular annual compensation directly to teachers through
school districts; and
3. Master: an additional fifteen (15) days to be used to
strengthen leadership. A person with a master teaching certificate
shall receive an annual salary increase stipend of Ten Thousand
Dollars ($10,000.00) or the district’s daily rate of pay, whichever
is higher, in addition to the salary for which the teacher qualifies
pursuant to Section 18-114.15 of this title. This increase stipend
shall be funded by state dollars from the lottery funds as provided
in Section 713 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes and shall be
paid as regular annual compensation directly to teachers through
school districts.
If a person with an advanced, lead, or master teaching
certificate changes school districts during the life of the
certificate, the terms of the contracts required in this subsection
shall be subject to approval by the new employing school district.
L. Beginning in the 2022-2023 school year, the Department shall
make the teaching certificates provided for in this section
available for any person who has received a recommendation from his
or her school district and who meets the eligibility criteria as
outlined in each school district’s teacher evaluation system
provided for in subsection I of this section.
M. The funding necessary for the administration of this section
shall be provided from the Teacher Empowerment Revolving Fund
created in Section 6-190.2 of this title. If funding for the
administration of the teaching certificates listed in subsection I
is not available, the Department shall not be required to fulfill
the requirements listed in subsections I, K, and L of this section.
N. The State Board of Education shall promulgate rules to
implement the provisions of Section 6-180 et seq. of this title.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY Section 2, Chapter 359, O.S.L.
2022, as amended by Section 2, Chapter 122, O.S.L. 2024 (70 O.S.
Supp. 2024, Section 6-190.2), is amended to read as follows:
ENR. H. B. NO. 1412 Page 8

Section 6-190.2. A. There is hereby created in the State
Treasury a revolving fund for the State Department of Education to
be designated the “Teacher Empowerment Revolving Fund”. The
revolving fund shall be a continuing fund, without legislative
appropriation, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall be
under the control and management of the State Department of
Education. Expenditures from the Teacher Empowerment Revolving Fund
shall be budgeted and expended as provided for in subsection B of
this section.
B. The State Department of Education shall utilize the funds
for the program outlined in Section 6-190 of this title. Funding
shall be allocated to school districts to provide the increased
salary stipend amounts indicated for advanced, lead, and master
certificates as provided for in subsection I of Section 6-190 of
this title on a first-come, first-served basis until the cash is
exhausted for the school year.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1412 Page 9

Passed the House of Representatives the 21st day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 7th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1412 Page 10